Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4097.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1e. (1) All of the following equipment, except for equipment that was installed or placed as described in this subsection before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, must not be installed in a new or existing school building, including on the rooftop or an adjacent structure to the school building, or placed within 1,500 feet of a school building: (a) A 4G or 5G main transmission antenna. (b) Equipment that is 6 cubic feet or more in size and is used to support 4G or 5G transmission. (c) A 4G or 5G support antenna. (2) This section does not prohibit the installation or placement of a small internet router unless the internet router weighs 15 pounds or more or is used only to provide 4G or 5G service. (3) As used in this section: (a) "4G" means the fourth generation of broadband cellular network technology. (b) "5G" means the fifth generation of broadband cellular network technology.